Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. PAUL; WEST 7TH STREET IMPROVEMENT PROJECT.new text end new text begin (a) $80,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of St. Paul for the city's West 7th Street Improvement Project to predesign, design, engineer, construct, and equip improvements to the roadway and underground water infrastructure from downtown St. Paul to the Mississippi River. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation includes money to modernize underground tunnels and the stormwater and wastewater infrastructure within them, ease the financial burden of water infrastructure connections to properties, reconstruct roads and sidewalks to improve safety, install traffic calming facilities, realign intersections, and improve transit opportunities by facilitating the operation of a bus rapid transit line connecting downtown St. Paul, Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport, and the Mall of America. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end